South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4738.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-26-20(n) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (n) the Commission on Higher Education in consultation with the State Department of Education and the staff of the South Carolina Student Loan Corporation, shall develop a Governor's Teaching Scholarship Loan Program to provide talented and qualified state residents loans not to exceed five thousand dollars a year to attend public or private colleges and universities for the purpose of becoming certified teachers employed in the public schools of this State.  The recipient of a loan is entitled to have up to one hundred percent of the amount of the loan plus the interest on the loan canceled if he becomes certified and teaches in the public schools of this State for at least five years.  The loan is canceled at the rate of twenty percent of the total principal amount of the loan plus interest on the unpaid balance for each complete year of teaching service in a public school.  However, beginning July 1, 1990, the loan is canceled at the rate of thirty-three and one-third percent of the total principal amount of the loan plus interest on the unpaid balance for each complete year of teaching service in both an academic critical need area and a geographic need area as defined annually by the State Board of Education.  In case of failure to make a scheduled repayment of any installment, failure to apply for cancellation or deferment of the loan on time, or noncompliance by a borrower with the purpose of the loan, the entire unpaid indebtedness plus interest is, at the option of the commission, immediately due and payable.  The recipient shall execute the necessary legal documents to reflect his obligation and the terms and conditions of the loan.  The loan program must be administered by the South Carolina Student Loan Corporation.  Funds generated from repayments to the loan program must be retained in a separate account and utilized as a revolving account for the purpose of making additional loans. Appropriations for loans and administrative costs must come from the Education Improvement Act of 1984 Fund, on the recommendation of the Commission on Higher Education to the State Treasurer, for use by the corporation.  The Education Oversight Committee shall review this scholarship loan program annually and report its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly.  For purposes of this item, a 'talented and qualified state resident' includes freshmen students who graduate in the top ten percentile of their high school class, or who receive a combined verbal plus mathematics Scholastic Aptitude Test score of at least eleven hundred and enrolled students who have completed one year (two semesters or the equivalent) of collegiate work and who have earned a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.5 on a 4.0 scale.  To remain eligible for the loan while in college, the student must maintain at least a 3.0 grade point average on a 4.0 scale.Reserved. SECTION 2.  Section 59-26-35(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) The South Carolina Commission on Higher EducationState Department of Education, with the assistance of the Department of EducationCommission on Higher Education, State Board of Education, the Center for Research on Teacher Education (SC-TEACHER), and the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office, shall form a commission to conduct a detailed assessment of the current data infrastructure, develop metrics, determine weightings, construct a unified data upload system, and construct public and private facing data reports including, but not limited to, annually publishing before November first an online report card known as the "South Carolina Educator Preparation Report Card".  The report card must be made available on the State Department of Education and the Commission on Higher Education's websites.  The commission shall develop a format that each educator preparation program must use on its website that shows all required information regarding its respective program.  The report card shall evaluate the ability of educator preparation programs, including alternative programs, to prepare new teachers for success in South Carolina's classrooms, as well as describe the school and district contexts in which completers work.  The report card must include data on a variety of measures to provide an overall picture of how well each educator preparation program prepares effective educators and meets state goals including, but not limited to, the following: (1) number of undergraduate and graduate completers; (2) placement and one, three, and five year retention rates by districts and regions of the State; (3) performance-based assessments of candidates; (4) ability of program to recruit a strong, diverse cohort of candidates and prepare them to teach in the content areas of greatest need; (5) quality of clinical experiences, including access to qualified and trained mentors, time in the field, and opportunities to apply knowledge and skills in the clinical setting; (6) effectiveness of individuals who completed a provider's program and are employed in a public school classroom. The information must be differentiated by provider and, where applicable, across content areas; and (7) graduate and employer satisfaction. SECTION 3.  Section 59-53-40 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-53-40.  (A) The board and local area commissions shall insureensure effective coordination with the public schools, other state agencies, literary councils, and private and nonprofit training organizations to maximize opportunities to best meet local education and training needs.  The board shall maintain effective coordination with the Commission on Higher Education and other educational boards and state agencies. The Board is required to submit to the Commission on Higher Education a budget and enrollment documentation for all existing and proposed college parallel courses or associate degree programs with college transfer credit by institutional location for review and comment prior to submission of the Board's total state budget request to the Governor. (B) All college parallel courses or associate degree programs are subject to the approval or termination by the Commission on Higher Education. SECTION 4.  Section 59-104-40 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-104-40. (A) The technical education system in this State shall convert from the quarter calendar to the semester calendar, if funds are appropriated for this purpose.  The Commission on Higher Education shall request state appropriations for the conversion to be funded and completed over a two-year period. (B) The State Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education, in consultation with the commission, shall limit the offering of courses designed for college transfer in those technical colleges that do not have approved college transfer programs.  The offering of "college parallel" general education courses in institutions not authorized to award the associate in arts or associate in science degree is limited to those necessary to support approved nontransfer programs.  The commission, after consultation with the State Board for Technical and Comprehensive Education and with public senior colleges and universities, shall establish rules and procedures by which this limitation must be regulated.  The commission shall establish procedures concerning courses acceptable for transfer as provided in Section 59-103-45(1). SECTION 5.  Section 59-143-10(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) Funds made available for Need-based Grants and Palmetto Fellows Scholarships through the Higher Education Scholarship Grants allocation must be no more than the prior year's earned revenue and must be released for use on July first and January first of each fiscal year.  Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, any unspent balance in the Higher Education Scholarship Grants allocation of the Children's Education Endowment Fund, including interest and low-level radioactive waste tax revenue from previous years' collections, may be made available for Need-based Grants and Palmetto Fellows Scholarships. SECTION 6.  Section 59-143-30 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-143-30. (1) Of the funds made available for higher education scholarship grants from the higher education scholarship grant allocation under Section 59-143-10 of the 1976 Code for any year, a percentage thereof must be allocated for higher education scholarships and grants for students attending South Carolina independent colleges of higher learning in this State.  This percentage shall be equivalent to the percentage of the independent colleges' share of the total South Carolina resident undergraduate full-time (FTE) enrollment of all public and independent higher education institutions in South Carolina based on the previous year's data as determined by the Commission on Higher Education and the South Carolina Tuition Grants Commission one-half shall be allocated for Need-based Grants and one-half shall be allocated for Palmetto Fellows Scholarships. (2) Of the total funds made available for higher education scholarship grants from the higher education scholarship grant allocation under Section 59-143-10 for any year, a percentage thereof must be allocated for students attending independent institutions of higher learning in this State. This percentage shall be equivalent to the percentage of the independent colleges' share of the total South Carolina resident undergraduate full time (FTE) enrollment of all public and independent institutions of higher learning in this State based on the previous year's data as determined by the Commission on Higher Education and the South Carolina Tuition Grants Commission. This percentage shall be drawn from the funds allocated under item (1) for Need-based Grants. (2)(3) The allocation each year to students at the South Carolina independent colleges under item (1) above(2) shall be used to provide tuition grants under Chapter 113 of Title 59 of the 1976 Code, and Palmetto Fellows Scholarships under Section 59-104-20 of the 1976 Code in the manner the General Assembly shall provide in the annual general appropriations act.  Of the funds allocated to independent college students, fifty percent shall be awarded for South Carolina Tuition Grants and fifty percent shall be awarded under the Palmetto Fellows Program.  The funds allocated for South Carolina Tuition Grants to South Carolina independent colleges students under this subsection shall be included in the annual appropriation to the Commission on Higher Education and transferred annually into the budget of the South Carolina Tuition Grants Commission in the amount prescribed in item (1)(2) above.  The funds allocated for Palmetto Fellows Scholarships to South Carolina independent college students under this subsection shall be included in the annual appropriation to the Commission on Higher Education and may only be awarded to eligible students attending South Carolina independent colleges. (3)(4) Independent colleges for purposes of this subsection means those institutions eligible to participate in the South Carolina Tuition Grants Program as defined by Section 59-113-50. (4)(5) Public institutions shall receive the remaining allocation each year of the funds made available for higher education scholarship grants under Section 59-143-10.  One-half shall be used to provide higher education need-based grants as provided for in this act or otherwise provided for in state law, and one-half shall be used to provide Palmetto Fellows Scholarships under Section 59-104-20 of the 1976 Code in the manner the General Assembly shall provide in the annual general appropriations act. (5)(6) The maximum amount of funding provided for awards to students attending South Carolina independent colleges from the Children's Education Endowment Fund for South Carolina Tuition Grants and Palmetto Fellows scholarships shall not exceed the percentage funding calculation described under item (1) above(2). SECTION 7.  Section 59-150-355 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-150-355.  (A) There is appropriated from the Education Lottery Account for the following education purposes and programs and funds for these programs and purposes shall be transferred by the Budget and Control BoardExecutive Budget Office as directed below. These appropriations must be used to supplement and not supplant existing funds for education. Distributions from the Education Lottery Account must be made on a quarterly basis by the last day of January, April, July, and October of each year, beginning in July 2002 if the account has accrued more than $35,000,000 in net proceeds by that date. The Budget and Control BoardExecutive Budget Office is directed to prepare the subsequent Lottery Expenditure Account detail budget to reflect the appropriations of the Education Lottery Account as provided in this sectionin the annual appropriations act.Fiscal year 2002-2003 certified net lottery proceeds and investment earnings of $172,000,000 are appropriated as follows:  Department of Education-K-5 Reading, Math, Science & Social Studies Program as provided in Section 59-1-525, $32,915,900;  School Buses, $8,000,000;  State Library, Aid to County Libraries as provided in Section 59-150-350(D), $1,500,000;  Commission on Higher Education-Endowed Chairs as provided in Chapter 75 of Title 2, $30,000,000; Commission on Higher Education-LIFE Scholarships as provided in Chapter 149 of Title 59, $40,000,000;  Palmetto Fellows Scholarships as provided in Section 59-104-20, $5,000,000;  National Guard Tuition Repayment Program as provided in Section 59-111-75, $1,500,000;  Technology:  Public 4-Year Universities, 2-Year Institutions, and State Technical Schools, $11,103,683;  Tuition Assistance-Technical Schools and 2-year institutions as provided in Section 59-150-360, $34,000,000;  HOPE Scholarships as provided in Section 59-150-370, $5,787,600;  Administration of Scholarships, Technical Grants, and Endowed Chair programs, $192,817;  South Carolina State University-Research and Technology Grant, $2,000,000;  Of the funds appropriated for technology, one-half must be used for University Technology Grant Program funds to be awarded to public four-year universities, excluding the University of South Carolina-Columbia, Clemson, and the Medical University of South Carolina. Grants must be awarded to institutions with grant proposals supporting the development of technology and/or technology infrastructure. The review process, to include the awarding of grants, is to be determined by the Commission on Higher Education. The remaining one-half of these funds appropriated for technology shall be Technology Grant Program funds to be used for technology upgrades across the public two-year institutions and the technical college system for the support and development of technology. One-half of one percent of the allocated amount must be used by the Commission on Higher Education to fund Palmetto Fellows Scholarships. Funds appropriated for Research and Technology Grant-South Carolina State University must be used to support basic and applied research in information and technology outreach opportunities for South Carolina's rural and urban citizens. (B)The Commission on Higher Education is authorized to temporarily transfer funds between appropriated line items and between recurring and nonrecurring funds in order to ensure the timely receipt of scholarships and tuition assistance. (C) Annual net lottery proceeds and investment earnings in excess of the certified net lottery proceeds and investment earnings are appropriated and must be used and must be carried forward to ensure that all LIFE, Palmetto Fellows, and HOPE Scholarships created or supplemented by the General Assembly are fully funded annually. If the lottery revenue received is less than the amounts appropriated, the projects and programs receiving appropriations for any such year must have their appropriations reduced on a pro rata basis, except that a reduction must not be applied to the funding of LIFE, Palmetto Fellows, and HOPE Scholarships. The amounts appropriated for school buses must be used for the purchase of new school buses and the repair of existing school buses. Fiscal year 2001-2002 certified net lottery proceeds and investment earnings of $80,000,000 are appropriated as follows:  Department of Education-Education Accountability Act, $23,903,683;  School Buses, $15,000,000;  Educational Television Commission-ETV Digitalization as provided in Section 59-150-350(D), $18,500,000;  Tuition Grants Commission-Tuition Grants, $3,000,000;  Commission on Higher Education-Teacher Grants as provided in Section 59-150-350(D), $2,000,000;  Technology:  Public 4-Year Universities, 2-Year Institutions, and State Technical Schools, $10,596,317;  Historically Black College and University Maintenance and Repair, $3,000,000;  South Carolina State University-Research and Technology Grant, $1,000,000;  Needs-Based Grants, $3,000,000. The funds appropriated to the Department of Education for the Education Accountability Act shall be used to provide homework centers ($1,548,440);  retraining grants ($4,637,000);  external review teams ($1,466,872);  teacher specialists ($12,581,069);  principal specialists ($2,270,302);  school-based pilot programs ($400,000);  and Palmetto Gold and Silver Awards Program ($1,000,000). Funds appropriated for teacher and principal specialists must be used first to fully fund these programs. Any funds remaining are to be used for the other five programs listed above. School-based Pilot Programs must include the deregulation of any school district with an overall absolute or improved designation of average or better when requested by the district. The amounts appropriated for school buses must be used for the purchase of new school buses including six appropriately equipped school buses for the School for the Deaf and the Blind, and the repair of existing school buses. Of the allocation for the purchase of new school buses, two new nineteen-passenger activity buses must be purchased for John de la Howe. Of the funds appropriated for technology, one-half must be used for University Technology Grant Program funds to be awarded to public four-year universities, excluding the University of South Carolina-Columbia, Clemson, and the Medical University of South Carolina. Grants must be awarded to institutions with grant proposals supporting the development of technology and/or technology infrastructure. The review process, to include the awarding of grants, is to be determined by the Commission on Higher Education. The remaining one-half of these funds appropriated for technology shall be Technology Grant Program funds to be used for technology upgrades across the public two-year institutions and the technical college system for the support and development of technology. One-half of one percent of the allocated amount must be used by the Commission on Higher Education to fund Palmetto Fellows Scholarships. The amounts appropriated for South Carolina's private historically black colleges and universities, as defined in 20 U.S. Code Section 1061, as amended, shall be appropriated in an equal amount to each institution to be used by the institutions for construction and renovation projects. Funds appropriated for Research and Technology Grant-South Carolina State University must be used to support basic and applied research in information and technology outreach opportunities for South Carolina's rural and urban citizens. Fiscal year 2002-2003 net lottery proceeds and investment earnings in excess of the certified net lottery proceeds and investment earnings for this period are appropriated and shall be used to ensure that all LIFE, Palmetto Fellows, and HOPE Scholarships created or supplemented by the General Assembly for fiscal year 2002-2003 in this section are fully funded. Fiscal year 2001-2002 net lottery proceeds and investment earnings in excess of certified net lottery proceeds and investment earnings for this period are appropriated and shall be carried forward and used to ensure that all LIFE, Palmetto Fellows, and HOPE Scholarships created or supplemented by the General Assembly for fiscal year 2002-2003 in this section are fully funded. For fiscal Year 2001-2002 and 2002-2003 the first $1,000,000 of unclaimed prize money is appropriated to the Budget and Control Board to contract for services assisting in the prevention and treatment of gambling disorders as specified in Section 59-150-230(I). Any revenue in excess of the $1,000,000 must be appropriated to the State Department of Education for the purchase and repair of school buses. If the lottery revenue received for fiscal year 2001-2002 or fiscal year 2002-2003 is less than the amounts appropriated, the projects and programs receiving appropriations for any such year shall have their appropriations reduced on a pro rata basis, except that a reduction must not be applied to the funding of LIFE, Palmetto Fellows, and HOPE Scholarships. SECTION 8.  Section 8-17-380 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 8-17-380.  With respect to the teaching and research faculty, professional librarians, academic administrators, and all other persons holding faculty appointments at any post-secondary educational institutions described in item (10) of Section 8-17-370, each such institution, subject to the approval of the Director of the Department of Administration or its designee and the Commission on Higher Education, shall establish in writing: (a) A performance appraisal procedure which shall assure: (1) annual review and evaluation of such employees; (2) written findings; (3) review of evaluations with each covered employee; (4) retention of performance appraisals and written comments of such employee, if any, in a permanent file with right of full disclosure to the employee. (b) A grievance procedure which shall at an appropriate stage provide a hearing for such employees before an individual or committee designated for such purposes, at which the employee shall have the right to representation by counsel and the opportunity to present evidence in his behalf.  Any such procedure shall include the right of the employee to appeal the post-hearing decision to the governing board of the institution, or a committee designated by the board for this purpose, such appeal to be limited to the record of the hearing. Discrimination in compensation, promotion, and work assignment shall be subjects for consideration by such grievance procedure.  Dismissal of tenured or other permanent employees and dismissal prior to the end of an employment contract term shall be only for cause, and shall be subject for consideration by such grievance procedure.  The granting or the failure to grant tenured status to such employees or nonrenewal of employment contracts at the end of the contract term shall not be subjects for consideration by such grievance procedure. The grievance and performance appraisal procedure provided for herein shall be submitted to the Department of Administration or its designee and the Commission on Higher Education for approval within six months after the establishment of any new institution. SECTION 9.  Chapter 51, Title 11, and sections 39-9-230, 59-54-20, 59-101-340, 59-101-360, 59-103-50, 59-103-120, 59-103-162, 59-104-210, 59-104-230, 59-104-410, 59-104-420, 59-104-430, 59-104-440, 59-105-60, 59-111-75, 59-121-15, 59-127-75, and 59-150-380 of the S.C. Code are repealed. SECTION 10. This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----